Tennessee, session 114, SB2076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-8-102, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (11) and (12) and substituting:
(11) "Orthoptics" means any ocular exercise for the correction or relief of
abnormal muscles or functions of the eyes;
(12) "Practice of optometry" means:
(A) The employment of an objective or subjective method for the purpose
of ascertaining eye health and a defect of vision, muscular anomaly, or another
abnormal condition of the eyelids, eyes, or the eye's adnexa;
(B) The prescribing of ophthalmic lenses or prisms to remedy or relieve a
defect of vision or muscular anomaly and the prescribing of contact lenses,
including those with prescription power and those without prescription power,
which are worn for cosmetic purposes;
(C) The use of orthoptics and the adjusting, fitting, or adapting of lenses,
prisms, or eyeglasses to remedy or relieve a defect of vision or a muscular
anomaly;
(D) The supplying, replacement, or duplication of an ophthalmic lens or
frame; and
(E) The examination, diagnosis, management, prevention, or treatment
of a condition or disease of the eyelid, eye, or the eye's adnexa, which includes
the following:
SB2076
011569
- 1 -

(i) The administration and prescribing of a pharmaceutical agent
rational to the diagnosis and treatment of a condition or disease of the
eyelid, eye, or the eye's adnexa by any route of administration approved
for such use;
(ii) The performance of primary eye care and surgical procedures
rational to the treatment of a condition or disease of the eyelid, eye, or the
eye's adnexa as determined by the board based on an optometrist's
education, training, and experience;
(iii) The performance or ordering of procedures, imaging, and
laboratory tests rational to the diagnosis of a condition or disease of the
eyelid, eye, or eye's adnexa;
(iv) The application of light amplification by stimulated emissions
of radiation (LASER) assisted procedures in the diagnosis, management,
and treatment of a condition or disease of the anterior segment of the
eyelids, eyes, or eye's adnexa;
(v) The administration of diphenhydramine, epinephrine, or an
equivalent medication to counteract anaphylaxis or anaphylactic reaction
and the use of anterior chamber paracentesis in an emergency situation
requiring immediate reduction of the pressure inside the eye;
(vi)
(a) The use of a local anesthetic in conjunction with the
primary care or surgical treatment of an eyelid lesion or changes
in the eye's adnexa as a result of non-pathological aging.
However, an optometrist shall not use a local anesthetic for such
purposes unless the optometrist has met the certification
- 2 - 011569

requirements as described in § 63-8-112(4) and in the rules
adopted by board for the administration of a pharmaceutical agent
in the performance of primary eye care and a surgical procedure;
and
(b) Utilizing local anesthesia by injection in performing the
following procedures:
(1) Needle drainage of an eyelid abscess,
hematoma, bulla, and seroma;
(2) Excision of a single epidermal lesion without
characteristics of malignancy, no larger than five
millimeters (5 mm) in size and no deeper than the dermal
layer of the skin;
(3) Incision and curettage of a nonrecurrent
chalazion;
(4) Simple repair of an eyelid laceration no larger
than two and one-half centimeters (2.5 cm) and no deeper
than the orbicularis muscle and not involving the eyelid
margin or lacrimal drainage structures;
(5) Removal of a foreign body in the eyelid not
involving lid margin, lacrimal drainage structures, and
extending no deeper than the orbicularis muscle; and
(6) Intramuscular, subcutaneous, and intradermal
pharmaceuticals for the aesthetic mitigation of non-
pathological aging facial tissue; and
- 3 - 011569

(vii) As approved by the board, the performance of a surgical
procedure for the correction and relief of an ocular abnormality, except for
the following procedures:
(a) Retina laser procedures, laser-assisted in situ
keratomileusis (LASIK), and photorefractive keratectomy (PRK);
(b) Non-laser surgery related to removal of the eye from a
living human being;
(c) Non-laser surgery requiring full thickness incision or
excision of the cornea or sclera other than paracentesis in an
emergency situation requiring immediate reduction of the pressure
inside the eye;
(d) Penetrating keratoplasty, also known as a corneal
transplant, or lamellar keratoplasty;
(e) Non-laser surgery requiring incision of the iris and
ciliary body;
(f) Non-laser surgery requiring incision of the vitreous;
(g) Non-laser surgery requiring incision of the retina;
(h) Non-laser surgical extraction of the crystalline lens;
(i) Incisional or excisional non-laser surgery of the
extraocular muscles;
(j) Non-laser surgery of the eyelid for an eyelid
malignancy, for incisional cosmetic, or mechanical repair of
blepharochalasis, ptosis, and tarsorrhaphy;
(k) Non-laser surgery of the bony orbit;
- 4 - 011569

(l) Incisional or excisional non-laser surgery of the lacrimal
system other than punctal dilation, lacrimal probing, lacrimal
irrigation, placement of punctal plugs, or other approved
therapeutic devices;
(m) Non-laser surgery requiring full thickness
conjunctivoplasty with graft or flap;
(n) A laser procedure into the vitreous chamber of the eye
to treat vitreous, retinal, or macular disease;
(o) The administration of general anesthesia; and
(p) Cataract surgery;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
An optometrist who uses a local anesthetic, as described in § 63-8-
102(12)(E)(vi), shall provide to the board proof of the following:
(1) The optometrist has a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)
certification by an organization approved by the board; and
(2) The optometrist has an automated external defibrillator (AED) present
at all times in the optometrist's office in which the optometrist is administering the
local anesthetic.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
An optometrist must be held to the same standard of care as that of other
physicians providing similar services.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 011569